Utah statutes.
59-13-403.   Administration and penalties -- Bond requirements.
(1)  All administrative and penalty provisions of Part 2, Motor Fuel, apply to
the administration of Part 4, Aviation Fuel.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a distributor is not required to furnish
a bond if the distributor:
(a)  meets the definition of distributor under Subsection 59-13-102(5)(d); and
(b)  has an average tax liability of $500 or less per month.
